Arkansas, session 2025, SB591.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 16, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 26 — Race Discrimination by Abortion Prohibition Act

20-16-2601. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Race
Discrimination by Abortion Prohibition Act”.

20-16-2602. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Abortion” means the act of using or prescribing any
instrument, medicine, drug, or any other substance, device, or means with the
intent to terminate the clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman, with
knowledge that the termination by any of those means will with reasonable
likelihood cause the death of the unborn child.
*JMB381*
04-09-2025 15:16:46 JMB381

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 SB591
(B) An act under subdivision (1)(A) of this section is not
an abortion if the act is performed with the intent to:
(i) Save the life or preserve the health of the
unborn child or the pregnant woman;
(ii) Remove a dead unborn child caused by spontaneous
abortion; or
(iii) Remove an ectopic pregnancy;
(2) “Incompetent” means an individual who has been adjudicated
as an individual with a disability and has had a guardian appointed for her;
(3) “Minor” means an individual under eighteen (18) years of
age;
(4) “Physician” means a person licensed to practice medicine in
this state, including a medical doctor and a doctor of osteopathy;
(5) “Race-selection abortion” means an abortion performed solely
on the basis of the race of the unborn child;
(6) “Unborn child” means the offspring of human beings from
conception until birth; and
(7) “Viability” means the state of fetal development when, in
the judgment of the physician based on the particular facts of the case
before him or her and in light of the most advanced medical technology and
information available to him or her, there is a reasonable likelihood of
sustained survival of the unborn child outside the body of the mother, with
or without artificial life support.

20-16-2603. Prohibition — Race-selection abortion.
(a) A physician or other person shall not intentionally perform or
attempt to perform an abortion with the knowledge that the pregnant woman is
seeking the abortion solely on the basis of the race of the unborn child.
(b) Before performing an abortion, the physician or other person who
is performing the abortion shall:
(1)(A) Ask the pregnant woman if she knows the race of the
unborn child.
(B) If the pregnant woman knows the race of the unborn
child, the physician or other person who is performing the abortion shall
inform the pregnant woman of the prohibition of abortion as a method of race
selection for children; and
04-09-2025 15:16:46 JMB381

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 SB591
(2)(A) Request the medical records of the pregnant woman
relating directly to the entire pregnancy history of the woman.
(B) An abortion shall not be performed until reasonable
time and effort is spent to obtain the medical records of the pregnant woman
as described in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section.
(c) If this section is held invalid as applied to the period of
pregnancy prior to viability, then the section shall remain applicable to the
period of pregnancy subsequent to viability.

20-16-2604. Criminal penalties.
A physician or other person who knowingly performs or attempts to
perform an abortion prohibited by this subchapter is guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor.

20-16-2605. Civil penalties and professional sanctions.
(a)(1) A physician or other person who knowingly violates this
subchapter is liable for damages and shall have his or her medical license
suspended or revoked as applicable.
(2) The physician or other person may also be enjoined from
future acts prohibited by this subchapter.
(b)(1) A woman who receives an abortion in violation of this
subchapter without being informed of the prohibition of abortion as a method
of race selection for children, the parent or legal guardian of the woman if
the woman is a minor who is not emancipated, or the legal guardian of the
woman if the woman has been adjudicated incompetent, may commence a civil
action for any reckless violation of this subchapter and may seek both actual
and punitive damages.
(2) Damages may include without limitation:
(A) Money damages for all psychological and physical
injuries occasioned by the violation of this subchapter; and
(B) Statutory damages equal to ten (10) times the cost of
the abortion performed in violation of this subchapter.
(c) A physician or other person who performs an abortion in violation
of this subchapter shall be considered to have engaged in unprofessional
conduct for which his or her license to provide healthcare services in this
state shall be suspended or revoked by the Arkansas State Medical Board.
04-09-2025 15:16:46 JMB381

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 SB591
(d)(1) A cause of action for injunctive relief against any physician
or other person who has knowingly violated this subchapter may be maintained
by:
(A) A person who is the spouse, parent, guardian, or
current or former licensed healthcare provider of the woman who receives or
attempts to receive an abortion in violation of this subchapter; or
(B) The Attorney General.
(2) The injunction shall prevent the physician or other person
from performing further abortions in violation of this subchapter.

20-16-2606. Exclusion of liability for a woman who undergoes
prohibited abortion.
(a) A woman who receives or attempts to receive an abortion in
violation of this subchapter shall not be prosecuted under this subchapter
for conspiracy to violate this subchapter or otherwise be held criminally or
civilly liable for any violation.
(b) In a criminal proceeding or action brought under this subchapter,
a woman who receives or attempts to receive an abortion in violation of this
subchapter is entitled to all rights, protections, and notifications afforded
to crime victims.
(c)(1) In a civil proceeding or action brought under this subchapter,
the anonymity of the woman who receives or attempts to receive the abortion
in violation of this subchapter shall be preserved from public disclosure
unless she gives her consent to disclosure.
(2) A court of competent jurisdiction, upon motion or sua
sponte, shall issue orders to the parties, witnesses, and counsel and direct
the sealing of the record and exclusion of the individuals from the courtroom
or hearing room to the extent necessary to safeguard the identity of the
woman from public disclosure.
(3) In the absence of written consent of the woman who receives
or attempts to receive an abortion in violation of this subchapter, a person
who initiates a proceeding or action under § 20-16-2605(b) or § 20-16-2605(d)
shall do so under a pseudonym.

20-16-2607. Construction.
(a) This subchapter shall not be construed as creating or recognizing
04-09-2025 15:16:46 JMB381

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 SB591
a right to abortion.
(b) It is not the intention of this subchapter to make lawful an
abortion that is currently unlawful.

20-16-2608. Right of intervention.
The General Assembly by joint resolution may appoint one (1) or more of
its members who sponsored or cosponsored this subchapter in his or her
official capacity to intervene as a matter of right in any case in which the
constitutionality of this law is challenged.

SECTION 2. Contingent effective date.
This act shall become effective only upon the certification by the
Attorney General that:
(1) The State of Arkansas is enjoined from preventing a person
from purposely performing or attempting to perform an abortion except to save
the life of a pregnant woman in a medical emergency under Arkansas Human Life
Protection Act, § 5-61-301 et seq., or the Arkansas Unborn Child Protection
Act, § 5-61-401 et seq.; or
(2) The Arkansas Human Life Protection Act, § 5-61-301 et seq.,
or the Arkansas Unborn Child Protection Act, § 5-61-401 et seq., have been
repealed or amended in whole or in part to allow a person to purposely
perform or attempt to perform an abortion except to save the life of a
pregnant woman in a medical emergency.

/s/C. Penzo











04-09-2025 15:16:46 JMB381